New York, session 2025-2026, S8206.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Chapter 192 of the laws of 2011, relating to authorizing 2 certain health care professionals licensed to practice in other juris- 3 dictions to practice in this state in connection with an event sanc- 4 tioned by New York Road Runners, as amended by chapter 141 of the laws 5 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 6 Section 1. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, any 7 person who is licensed or certified to practice as a physician, physi- 8 cian assistant, massage therapist, physical therapist, chiropractor, 9 dentist, optometrist, nurse, nurse practitioner, [certified] emergency 10 medical technician, athletic trainer or podiatrist in another state or 11 territory, who is in good standing in such state or territory and who 12 has been appointed by the New York Road Runners to provide professional 13 services at an event in this state sanctioned by the New York Road 14 Runners, may provide such professional services to athletes and team 15 personnel registered to train at a location in this state or registered 16 to compete in an event conducted under the sanction of the New York Road 17 Runners in the state without first being licensed pursuant to the 18 provisions of title 8 of the education law or certified pursuant to the 19 provisions of the public health law, as may be applicable. Such services EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13106-06-5 S. 8206--A 2 1 shall be provided only four days before through one day after each of 2 the following events: 3 a. the New York city marathon scheduled to be held on November [3, 4 2024] 2, 2025, and a date in November or as otherwise permitted by the 5 city of New York in 2026; 6 b. the Brooklyn half marathon scheduled to be held on May [18, 2024] 7 17, 2025, and a date in May or as otherwise permitted by the city of New 8 York in 2026; 9 c. the Bronx 10 mile scheduled to be held on September [22, 2024] 14, 10 2025, and a date in September or as otherwise permitted by the city of 11 New York in 2026; 12 d. the New York city half marathon scheduled to be held on March [17, 13 2024] 16, 2025, and a date in March or as otherwise permitted by the 14 city of New York in 2026; 15 e. the Staten Island half marathon scheduled to be held on October 16 [13, 2024] 12, 2025, and a date in October or as otherwise permitted by 17 the city of New York in 2026; and 18 f. the Queens 10k scheduled to be held on June [15, 2024] 14, 2025, 19 and a date in June or as otherwise permitted by the city of New York in 20 2026. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 22 deemed repealed December 31, [2024] 2026. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 24 have been in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2025; 25 provided that the amendments to section 1 of chapter 192 of the laws of 26 2011, made by section one of this act, shall not affect the repeal of 27 such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.